static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.dic
имеҙ/220	[Verb]
бәйелһеҙ/220	[Verb]
биҙ/220	[Verb]
тапап-иҙ/220	[Verb]
бел-һиҙ/220	[Verb]
түҙ/220	[Verb]
ей/220	[Verb]
тей/220	[Verb]
күбәй/220	[Verb]
ирәбәй/220	[Verb]
шәбәйгәндән-шәбәй/220	[Verb]
бейегәй/220	[Verb]
һөҙәгәй/220	[Verb]
һирәгәй/220	[Verb]
әҙәйгәндән-әҙәй/220	[Verb]
кәүжәй/220	[Verb]
кәйкәй/220	[Verb]
сөңкәй/220	[Verb]
шөңкәй/220	[Verb]
сүкәй/220	[Verb]
кәшкәй/220	[Verb]
еңеләй/220	[Verb]
элмәй/220	[Verb]
иркенәй/220	[Verb]
түбәнәй/220	[Verb]
өлкәнәй/220	[Verb]
һүрәнәй/220	[Verb]
тәрәнәйгәндән-тәрәнәй/220	[Verb]
киңәйгәндән-киңәй/220	[Verb]
йәлпәй/220	[Verb]
һерпәй/220	[Verb]
кәпәй/220	[Verb]
көҙрәй/220	[Verb]
секерәй/220	[Verb]
кәперәй/220	[Verb]
кесерәй/220	[Verb]
һерәй/220	[Verb]
бәзрәй/220	[Verb]
екрәй/220	[Verb]
бөкрәй/220	[Verb]
көмрәй/220	[Verb]
шөмрәй/220	[Verb]
өңрәй/220	[Verb]
йәпрәй/220	[Verb]
һәпрәй/220	[Verb]
өтрәй/220	[Verb]
тексәй/220	[Verb]
кәксәй/220	[Verb]
көсәйгәндән-көсәй/220	[Verb]
бөрсәй/220	[Verb]
бәләкәсәйгәндән-бәләкәсәй/220	[Verb]
ситәй/220	[Verb]
өлтәй/220	[Verb]
сүлтәй/220	[Verb]
шөмтәй/220	[Verb]
бөтәй/220	[Verb]
тертәй/220	[Verb]
бүртәй/220	[Verb]
шөштәй/220	[Verb]
төмһәй/220	[Verb]
ишәй/220	[Verb]
кәкшәй/220	[Verb]
йәмшәй/220	[Verb]
ләпшәй/220	[Verb]
кәүшәй/220	[Verb]
сигер/220	[Verb]
үгер/220	[Verb]
елдер/220	[Verb]
һибелдер/220	[Verb]
йәйелдер/220	[Verb]
һирпелдер/220	[Verb]
кирелдер/220	[Verb]
бәрелдер/220	[Verb]
сәселдер/220	[Verb]
кителдер/220	[Verb]
ишелдер/220	[Verb]
элдер/220	[Verb]
көрмәлдер/220	[Verb]
йүнәлдер/220	[Verb]
терәлдер/220	[Verb]
сәлдер/220	[Verb]
мәтәлдер/220	[Verb]
күбендер/220	[Verb]
кейендер/220	[Verb]
елкендер/220	[Verb]
үкендер/220	[Verb]
һәлендер/220	[Verb]
елпендер/220	[Verb]
кәпәрендер/220	[Verb]
әсендер/220	[Verb]
эҫендер/220	[Verb]
күҙһендер/220	[Verb]
сәйерһендер/220	[Verb]
мөрхәтһендер/220	[Verb]
йәшендер/220	[Verb]
дүндер/220	[Verb]
һүндер/220	[Verb]
биҙәндер/220	[Verb]
бөркәндер/220	[Verb]
кейеҙләндер/220	[Verb]
етеҙләндер/220	[Verb]
хәлһеҙләндер/220	[Verb]
ерһеҙләндер/220	[Verb]
кәйефһеҙләндер/220	[Verb]
мөгөҙләндер/220	[Verb]
көсһөҙләндер/220	[Verb]
үҙләндер/220	[Verb]
икеләндер/220	[Verb]
етдиләндер/220	[Verb]
өйләндер/220	[Verb]
әйләндер/220	[Verb]
теремекләндер/220	[Verb]
бөртөкләндер/220	[Verb]
йәйпәкләндер/220	[Verb]
түңәрәкләндер/220	[Verb]
йәшелләндер/220	[Verb]
хәлләндер/220	[Verb]
һөйкөмләндер/220	[Verb]
йәмләндер/220	[Verb]
сәмләндер/220	[Verb]
енләндер/220	[Verb]
йәнләндер/220	[Verb]
төрлөләндер/220	[Verb]
төпләндер/220	[Verb]
әҙерләндер/220	[Verb]
күмерләндер/220	[Verb]
төйөрләндер/220	[Verb]
төрләндер/220	[Verb]
ғәрләндер/220	[Verb]
хисләндер/220	[Verb]
тәгәрмәсләндер/220	[Verb]
иләҫләндер/220	[Verb]
һәүәҫләндер/220	[Verb]
өмөтләндер/220	[Verb]
этләндер/220	[Verb]
ғәҙәтләндер/220	[Verb]
хәрәкәтләндер/220	[Verb]
хеҙмәтләндер/220	[Verb]
сәләмәтләндер/220	[Verb]
ғәйрәтләндер/220	[Verb]
һүрәтләндер/220	[Verb]
сихәтләндер/220	[Verb]
зәғифләндер/220	[Verb]
күләгәләндер/220	[Verb]
бөҙрәләндер/220	[Verb]
кинәндер/220	[Verb]
өшәндер/220	[Verb]
теҙҙер/220	[Verb]
һиҙҙер/220	[Verb]
тейҙер/220	[Verb]
кирҙер/220	[Verb]
эйер/220	[Verb]
екер/220	[Verb]
һикер/220	[Verb]
йүткер/220	[Verb]
ватып-емер/220	[Verb]
тилмер/220	[Verb]
күпер/220	[Verb]
ашатып-эсер/220	[Verb]
бүҫер/220	[Verb]
эйектер/220	[Verb]
еректер/220	[Verb]
кисектер/220	[Verb]
интектер/220	[Verb]
сиктер/220	[Verb]
килтер/220	[Verb]
һиптер/220	[Verb]
кистер/220	[Verb]
фәстер/220	[Verb]
ебеттер/220	[Verb]
теттер/220	[Verb]
әйттер/220	[Verb]
кирттер/220	[Verb]
һүттер/220	[Verb]
эшләттер/220	[Verb]
бейештер/220	[Verb]
күмештер/220	[Verb]
етештер/220	[Verb]
өлгәштер/220	[Verb]
сәкәштер/220	[Verb]
кешеләштер/220	[Verb]
ерлекләштер/220	[Verb]
индустриалләштер/220	[Verb]
муниципалләштер/220	[Verb]
еңелләштер/220	[Verb]
стилләштер/220	[Verb]
ғәмәлләштер/220	[Verb]
көнләштер/220	[Verb]
берләштер/220	[Verb]
йәмғиәтләштер/220	[Verb]
эйәләштер/220	[Verb]
йәлпәштер/220	[Verb]
бешер/220	[Verb]
бир/220	[Verb]
тир/220	[Verb]
бәр/220	[Verb]
елгәр/220	[Verb]
түңкәр/220	[Verb]
үткәр/220	[Verb]
бәҫәр/220	[Verb]
дөмһәр/220	[Verb]
